Wisconsin, session 2025, AB568.
do enact as follows:AB568,11Section 1. 609.74 of the statutes is created to read:AB568,2,32609.74 Coverage of infertility services. Defined network plans and 3preferred provider plans are subject to s. 632.895 (15m).AB568,24Section 2. 632.895 (15m) of the statutes is created to read:AB568,2,55632.895 (15m) Coverage of infertility services. (a) In this subsection:AB568,2,1161. “Diagnosis of and treatment for infertility” means any recommended 7procedure or medication at the direction of a physician that is consistent with 8established, published, or approved medical practices or professional guidelines 9from the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, or its successor 10organization, or the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, or its successor 11organization.AB568,2,13122. “Infertility” means a disease, condition, or status characterized by any of 13the following:AB568,3,214a. The failure to establish a pregnancy or carry a pregnancy to a live birth 15after regular, unprotected sexual intercourse for, if the woman is under the age of 1635, no longer than 12 months or, if the woman is 35 years of age or older, no longer 1than 6 months including any time during those 12 months or 6 months that the 2woman has a pregnancy that results in a miscarriage.AB568,3,43b. An individual’s inability to reproduce either as a single individual or with a 4partner without medical intervention.AB568,3,75c. A physician’s findings based on a patient’s medical, sexual, and 6reproductive history, age, physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination 7of these factors.AB568,3,983. “Self-insured health plan” means a self-insured health plan of the state or 9a county, city, village, town, or school district.AB568,3,16104. “Standard fertility preservation service” means a procedure that is 11consistent with established medical practices or professional guidelines published 12by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, or its successor organization, or 13the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or its successor organization, for a 14person who has a medical condition or is expected to undergo medication therapy, 15surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment that is recognized by 16medical professionals to directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment to fertility.AB568,3,2317(b) Subject to pars. (c) to (e), every disability insurance policy and self-insured 18health plan that provides coverage for medical or hospital expenses shall cover 19diagnosis of and treatment for infertility and standard fertility preservation 20services. Coverage required under this paragraph includes at least 4 completed 21oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers in accordance with the guidelines 22of the American Society for Reproductive Medicine or its successor organization and 23single embryo transfer may be used when recommended and medically appropriate.AB568,4,21(c) 1. A disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan may not do any 2of the following:AB568,4,53a. Impose any exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage 4required under par. (b) based on a covered individual’s participation in fertility 5services provided by or to a 3rd party.AB568,4,96b. Impose any exclusion, limitation, or other restriction on coverage of 7medications that are required to be covered under par. (b) that are different from 8those imposed on any other prescription medications covered under the policy or 9plan.AB568,4,1510c. Impose any exclusion, limitation, cost-sharing requirement, benefit 11maximum, waiting period, or other restriction on coverage of the diagnosis of and 12treatment for infertility and standard fertility preservation services required under 13par. (b) that is different from an exclusion, limitation, cost-sharing requirement, 14benefit maximum, waiting period, or other restriction imposed on benefits for 15services that are covered by the policy or plan and that are not related to infertility.AB568,4,19162. A disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan shall provide 17coverage required under par. (b) to any covered individual under the policy or plan, 18including any covered spouse and nonspouse dependent, to the same extent as other 19pregnancy-related benefits covered under the policy or plan.AB568,5,220(d) The commissioner, after consulting with the department of health services 21on appropriate treatment for infertility, shall promulgate any rules necessary to 22implement this subsection. Before the promulgation of rules, disability insurance 23policies and self-insured health plans are considered to comply with the coverage 1requirements of par. (b) if the coverage conforms to the standards of the American 2Society for Reproductive Medicine.AB568,5,43(e) This subsection does not apply to a disability insurance policy that is a 4health benefit plan described under s. 632.745 (11) (b).AB568,35Section 3. Initial applicability.AB568,5,86(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, the 7act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 8subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB568,5,139(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 10agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, the act first applies to 11policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 12on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 13modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB568,414Section 4. Effective date.AB568,5,1615(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 16publication.AB568,5,1717